District of Columbia statutes.
34-1259.04

Provision of information; retention of records.

(a)

A cable operator shall take all steps necessary to ensure that it is able to provide the District all information that must be provided or may be requested under this chapter or the franchise agreement, including providing appropriate subscriber privacy notices. A cable operator shall be responsible for redacting any data that federal law prevents it from providing to the District. The District retains the right to question any such redaction and to challenge it in any forum having jurisdiction over such a challenge.

(b)

A cable operator shall maintain all records required by this chapter of a franchise agreement, and all records which may be reasonably requested under this chapter or the franchise agreement, for at least 3 years.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 904
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334